Hawaii statutes.
[§328-115] Inspection. Wholesale
distributors shall permit agents of the department, agents of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, and authorized federal, state, or local law
enforcement officials to enter and inspect their premises and delivery
vehicles, and to audit their records, written operating procedures, and lists
of responsible persons, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, to the
extent authorized by law. [L 1992, c 196, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next